Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.
§ 77-3-13.
Issuance of certificates; temporary certificates; cancelability review upon change of ownership.

The commission shall issue a certificate of convenience and necessity to any person engaged in the construction or operation of such equipment or facility as is mentioned in subsection (1) of Section 77-3-11 on March 29, 1956, for the construction or operation then being conducted, without requiring proof that public convenience and necessity will be served by such construction or operation, and without further proceedings, if application for such certificate is made to the commission within six (6) months after March 29, 1956. Any utility covered by this chapter which has heretofore been under the jurisdiction of the commission shall, upon application within six (6) months of March 29, 1956, be issued a certificate authorizing it to conduct operations and make extensions within any area covered by its service area map or maps on file with the commission on March 29, 1956.

The commission shall issue a certificate of convenience and necessity to any person engaged in the construction or operation of a sewage disposal service as mentioned in subsection (2) of Section 77-3-11 on August 9, 1968, for the construction or operation then being conducted, without requiring proof that public convenience and necessity will be served by such construction or operation, and without further proceedings, if application for such certificate is made to the commission within six (6) months after August 9, 1968. Pending the filing of such application and the issuance of a certificate, the continuance of such construction or operation shall be lawful.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by subsection (2) of Section 77-3-11 or by this subsection, that portion of the business of a public utility dealing with the operation of a sewage disposal service as provided by subsection (2) of Section 77-3-11 shall be subject to provisions of this chapter, in like manner and with like effect as if such business had been included within the definition of a “public utility” in the original enactment of this chapter.

In all other cases, the commission shall set the matter for hearing, and shall give reasonable notice of the hearing thereon to all interested persons, as in its judgment may be necessary under its rules and regulations, involving the financial ability and good faith of the applicant, the necessity for additional services and such other matters as the commission deems relevant. The commission may issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or refuse to issue the same or issue it for the establishment or construction of a portion only of the contemplated plant, route, line or system, or extension thereof, or for the partial exercise only of such right or privilege, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate such reasonable terms and conditions as to time or otherwise as, in its judgment, the public convenience, necessity and protection may require, and may forfeit such certificate after issuance for noncompliance with its terms, or provide therein for an ipso facto forfeiture of the same for failure to exercise the rights granted within the time fixed by the certificate. However, nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring such certificate for a municipally owned plant, project or development, route, line or system or extension thereof in areas within one (1) mile of the corporate boundaries which are not certificated to another utility, and nothing in this chapter or other provision of law shall be construed as allowing a municipally owned plant, project or development, route, line or system or extension thereof in areas certificated to another utility. No certificate shall be required for extensions or additions within the corporate limits of a municipality being served by the holder of a certificate of convenience and necessity.

The commission shall, prior to issuing a certificate of public convenience and necessity to a public utility for any new construction, extension or addition to its property, ascertain that all labor, materials, property or services to be rendered for any proposed project will be supplied at reasonable prices. The commission shall, after issuance of a certificate for facilities estimated to cost Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or more or estimated to cost an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the rate base allowed by the commission in the utility’s last rate case, whichever is greater, assign the public utilities staff to monitor such projects, to inspect periodically construction in progress, and to report to the commission any variances or deviations as found, if any, and to file progress reports thereon with the commission. Such public utility shall file a similar report with the commission at such times and in such form as the commission shall require, including any substantial changes in plans and specifications, cost allocations, construction schedule and funds available to complete the project.

The commission may issue a temporary certificate in cases of emergency, to assure maintenance of adequate service or to serve particular customers, without notice or hearing, pending the determination of an application for a certificate, and may by regulation exempt from the requirements of Sections 77-3-11 through 77-3-21: (a) temporary acts or operations for which the issuance of a certificate will not be required in the public interest; and (b) extensions or additions of service facilities outside of municipalities under such general rules as will promote the prompt availability of such service to prospective users, and at the same time prevent unnecessary and uneconomic duplication of such facilities as between two (2) or more persons.

Prior to the acquisition pursuant to Section 77-3-17, or other provisions of law, by any public agency, authority, district, state or other agency, institution or political subdivision thereof, of any certificate of public convenience and necessity or portion thereof, service areas or portion thereof, or operating rights or portion thereof, issued or granted by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section and/or the facilities or other properties and equipment of the utility providing service therein of any regulated utility, as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), (ii) and (iii), the commission shall first determine if such service area, certificate of public convenience and necessity, or operating right, or portions thereof, should be cancelled as provided in Section 77-3-21.

Before the acquisition pursuant to any negotiated purchase agreement entered into before 1987, by any public agency, authority, district, state or other agency, institution or political subdivision thereof, of any certificate of public convenience and necessity or portion thereof, service areas or portion thereof, or operating rights or portion thereof, issued or granted by the commission pursuant to this section and/or the facilities or other properties and equipment of the utility providing service therein of any regulated utility defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), the commission first shall determine that such service area, certificate of public convenience and necessity, or operating right, or portions thereof, shall be cancelled as provided in Section 77-3-21.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the certificate as applied for may be granted without a hearing in uncontested cases; however, the commission may hear any uncontested case if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7716-05, 7716-45; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5; Laws, 1968, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 4, 2002).

§ 77-3-14.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity required for construction of electrical generating and transmitting facilities; commission to maintain analysis of electricity needs in state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 77-3-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, and Section 77-3-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, no public utility or other person shall begin the construction of any facility for the generation and transmission of electricity to be directly or indirectly used for the furnishing of public utility service in this state, even though the facility be for furnishing the service already being rendered, without first obtaining from the commission a certificate that the public convenience and necessity requires, or will require, such construction.

The commission shall develop, publicize and keep current an analysis of the long-range needs for expansion of facilities for the generation of electricity in Mississippi, including its estimate of the probable future growth of the use of electricity, the probable needed generation reserves, the extent, size, mix and general location of generating plants and arrangements for pooling power to the extent not regulated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and other arrangements with other utilities and energy suppliers to achieve maximum efficiencies for the benefit of the people of Mississippi, and shall consider such analysis in acting upon any petition by any utility for construction. Each public utility engaged in the generation, transmission and distribution of electric energy shall, upon request of the commission, submit to the commission its forecasts and plans for the addition of generating capacity planned by the utility for an ensuing five-year period and shall furnish to the commission such documents and proof with respect to the need therefor as the commission may reasonably require. In considering these analyses and forecasts, the commission shall consult with the University Research Center, the utilities commissions or comparable agencies of neighboring states, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and other agencies having relevant information and/or duties and responsibilities in this area, and particularly with the Department of Economic and Community Development with reference to the accomplishment of the Mississippi Energy Plan provided for in Section 57-39-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In acting upon any petition for the construction of any facility for the generation of electricity, the commission shall take into account the utility’s arrangements with other electric utilities for interchange of power, pooling of plant, purchase of power and other methods for providing reliable, efficient and economical electric service.

As a condition for receiving such certificate, the utility shall file an estimate of construction costs in such detail as the commission may require. The commission shall hold a public hearing on each application, and no certificate shall be granted unless the commission has approved the estimated construction costs.

The commission shall maintain an ongoing review of such construction as it proceeds, and the applicant shall submit at such times as the commission shall require during construction a progress report and any revisions in the cost estimates for the construction.

The certification requirements of this section shall not apply to persons who construct an electric generating facility primarily for that person’s own use and not for the primary purpose of producing electricity, heat or steam for sale to or for the public for compensation; and the commission may provide for exemption from certification requirements for cogeneration facilities and small standby facilities; provided, however, that such persons shall, nevertheless, be required to report to the commission the proposed construction of such a facility before beginning construction thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 90; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-3-15.
Two or more persons holding certificates for similar operations in same municipality.

Where there shall be two (2) or more persons holding certificates of convenience and necessity for similar operation in the same municipality, such operation may be carried on by such persons within their respective certificated areas and such persons shall be exempt from further application to the commission for extension of or additions to their facilities within their respective certificated areas of said municipality, including any extensions of the corporate limits thereof.

Municipally operated utilities shall not be subject to regulation under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2013).

§ 77-3-16.
Bids required on certain public utility contracts; exceptions; list of contractors and suppliers.

All contracts for construction, extension and/or repair of facilities in excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) by or on the behalf of any public utility subject to rate regulations by the Mississippi Public Service Commission, shall be governed by this section. The public utility shall maintain a list of contractors and suppliers qualified to perform contracts within the scope of proposed utility projects. The public utility shall, upon written request of any qualified prospective bidder, add his or its name to such list. At least every six (6) months, the public utility shall publish in a newspaper, having general circulation in the area in which the utility operates, a notice requesting names of qualified contractors and suppliers. Upon written request by qualified contractors and suppliers, those names shall be added to such list. The public utility shall give to each contractor or supplier on said list who is qualified with respect to a project under consideration written invitation to bid those projects subject to this section. Contracts subject to this section shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder. Provided, however, nothing contained herein shall prohibit any public utility from performing services covered by this section with its own regularly employed work force.

The public utility may enter into a master contract with the lowest and best contractor to cover all construction work to be performed in a specified geographic area.

If the chief executive officer of a public utility determines that an emergency exists which affects the public health, safety or welfare, the provisions of this section shall not apply. As used in this section an emergency is any occurrence in which service is interrupted.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts which by their nature are not adapted to competitive bidding, including but not limited to:

Items which may be acquired from a sole source;

Contracts for professional services;

Equipment and systems which by reason of the training of personnel or of any inventory replacement of parts maintained by the utility, are or should be compatible with existing equipment;

Contracts for interstate or intrastate carriage of persons or property with a common carrier or contract carrier at the rates set forth in the officially approved tariff of that carrier; and

Such contracts as the commission may define by regulation.

The public service commission shall have the authority to monitor all conditions contained in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-17.
Operation of public utility following expiration of municipal franchise; municipal acquisition of utility.

In addition to such other rights as it may have to use the streets, alleys and public places of a municipality, a public utility which holds a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted under the provisions of this article covering the geographical area of such municipality, and which (1) is operating under a municipal franchise on March 29, 1956, or (2) shall have previously operated under such a municipal franchise which has expired within five (5) years prior to said date, or (3) which shall hereafter operate under a municipal franchise hereafter granted, may, after the expiration of any such franchise continue to use the streets, alleys and public places therein situated upon condition that (1) such utility shall pay the said municipality compensation therefor at the rate of two percent (2%) of said utility’s gross revenue from sales to residential and commercial customers within said municipality, in case of a utility defined in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3 and in the case of a utility defined in subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (d) of said Section the said utility shall pay two percent (2%) of the monthly service charges in said municipality whether said utility has a franchise to operate therein or not, such payments to be made quarterly of each year, and (2) after the expiration of such franchise the municipality, or any customer of such utility in such municipality, upon appropriate petition, shall be entitled to a hearing as to whether or not the certificate of convenience and necessity may then and thereafter be granted on a permanent basis. Any co-operative which shall operate within any area of a municipality shall likewise pay such municipality two percent (2%) of the co-operative’s gross revenue from sales to residential and commercial customers within said municipality.

Any municipality shall have the right to acquire by purchase, negotiation or condemnation the facilities of any utility that is now or may hereafter be located within the corporate limits of such municipality; provided, however, prior to any municipality exercising the right of eminent domain as provided herein, the commission shall determine that the certificate of public convenience and necessity granted to the utility pursuant to Section 77-3-13 for the service area wherein such facilities are located, shall be cancelled as provided in Section 77-3-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 353, § 3, eff from and after passage (Governor’s veto overridden by Legislature on March 17, 1987).

§ 77-3-19.
Applicant for certificate must obtain a municipal franchise.

Notwithstanding any provision in this article to the contrary, in any case where a utility is located and operates, or proposed to locate and operate in a municipality where streets and other public places are essential to such location and operation, no certificate of convenience and necessity shall be issued thereasto without prior franchise granted by the municipality. Such franchise shall not contain any provision conflicting with or repugnant to the exclusive jurisdiction of the commission to regulate rates and services of the utilities as provided in this article. Applicants for certificates of convenience and necessity shall attach to their applications true and correct copies of franchises issued to them by such municipality as the application may embrace. The commission is authorized so to amend such franchise as to exclude and remove therefrom any provision in conflict with or repugnant to the exclusive jurisdiction of the commission over rates and services and which shall in any way fix or affect rates. Should any municipality arbitrarily refuse to grant a franchise or provide for an election for a franchise as provided by law to a utility now operating within said municipality within ninety (90) days after application for said franchise is made, then the utility may obtain a certificate of convenience and necessity without the necessity of first obtaining a franchise. The commission shall so issue said certificate of convenience and necessity upon proper showing by the utility that said franchise is being arbitrarily withheld.

In the event the commission shall rule that a franchise is being arbitrarily withheld and shall issue a certificate of necessity as hereinabove mentioned, the utility obtaining said certificate of convenience and necessity shall not be required to pay to said municipality the two percent (2%) provided for in Section 77-3-17 until such a franchise has been granted to said utility.

In the case of a public utility as defined in subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (d) of Section 77-3-3 which has heretofore been under the jurisdiction of the commission and has its service area maps on file with the commission on March 29, 1956, under such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission shall prescribe, the commission is authorized to issue to such utility a certificate of convenience and necessity without requiring such utility to first obtain a municipal franchise as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5.

§ 77-3-21.
Hearing on adequacy of service afforded by certificate holder.

The commission may, after a hearing had upon due notice, make such findings as may be supported by proof as to whether any utility holding a certificate under the provisions of this article is rendering reasonably adequate service in any area covered by such utility’s certificate. In the event the commission finds that such utility is not rendering reasonably adequate service the commission may enter an order specifying in what particulars such utility has failed to render reasonably adequate service and order that such failure be corrected within a reasonable time, such time to be fixed in such order. If the utility so ordered to correct such a failure fails to comply with such order of the commission and the commission finds that cancellation of its certificate would be in the best interest of the consuming public served by the holder of the certificate, its certificate for the area affected may be revoked and cancelled by the commission.

Prior to any municipality exercising the power of eminent domain as provided in Section 77-3-17, the commission shall determine that the certificate of public convenience and necessity granted to the utility pursuant to Section 77-3-13 for the service area wherein such facilities are located, shall be cancelled as provided in this section. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to include service for water and sewage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 353, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1992).

§ 77-3-22.
Placement of privately owned water and sewer systems in receivership; conditions.

If the commission determines that any privately owned water and/or sewer system within its jurisdiction is unable or unwilling to adequately serve its customers or has been actually or effectively abandoned by its owner, or that its management is grossly inefficient, irresponsible or unresponsive to the needs of its customers, the commission or its designated representative may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of any county wherein the public utility does business for an order attaching the assets of the privately owned water and/or sewer system and placing such water and/or sewer system under the sole control and responsibility of a receiver. If the court determines that the petition is proper in all respects and finds, after a hearing thereon, the allegations contained in the petition are true, it shall order that the water and/or sewer system be placed in receivership. The court, in its discretion and in consideration of the recommendation of the commission or its designated representative, may appoint a receiver who shall be a responsible individual, partnership, corporation or political subdivision knowledgeable in water or sewer service affairs and who shall maintain control and responsibility for the operation and management of the affairs of such water and/or sewer system. The receiver shall operate the water and/or sewer system so as to preserve the assets of the water and/or sewer system and to serve the best interests of its customers. The receiver shall be compensated from the assets of the water and/or sewer system in an amount to be determined by the court.

Control of and responsibility for the water and/or sewer system shall remain in the receiver until the court determines that it is in the best interests of the customers that the water and/or sewer system be returned to the owner, transferred to another owner or assumed by another water and/or sewer system or public service corporation. If the court, after hearing, determines that control of and responsibility for the affairs of the water and/or sewer system should not be returned to the legal owner thereof, the receiver may proceed to liquidate the assets of such water and/or sewer system in the manner provided by law.

Mississippi laws and Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure generally applicable to receivership shall govern receiverships created under this section.

This section is in addition to the provisions of Section 77-3-21.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 10; Laws, 1995, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 77-3-22.1.
Preferences in transfer of ownership of privately owned water or sewer system in receivership.

In any county having a population of more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) but less than forty thousand (40,000), according to the most recent federal decennial census, any water or sewer system for which a finding is made under Section 49-17-44.1 or Section 77-3-22 by a court of competent jurisdiction that it is appropriate for a receiver to be appointed, the receiver shall give preference to a municipality within the county or to the governing authorities of the county in making any transfer of ownership of the water or sewer system. The term “preference,” as used in this section, means that no sale or transfer of the water or sewer system shall be approved by a court of competent jurisdiction or otherwise until two (2) years after the date of appointment of the receiver have elapsed. This right of preference may be waived by the local governmental entity given the preference under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 307, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 27, 2003).

§ 77-3-23.
Procedure for sale, assignment, lease or transfer of certificate.

It shall be lawful, under the conditions specified below, for public utilities to sell, assign, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose, including, without limitation, any change in control of (a) certificates of public convenience and necessity issued to them under the provisions of this article, or (b) any substantial part of its property necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, including corporate stock that is not publicly traded.

Whenever a purchase, lease, assignment or transfer is proposed, the utility or utilities or the person seeking authority therefor shall present an application to the commission in such form as may be prescribed by the commission. Thereupon the commission shall notify the applicant or applicants and other parties known to have a substantial interest in the proceedings of the time and place for a public hearing at least twenty (20) days prior thereto, unless the commission shall find that public convenience or necessity requires that such hearings be held at an earlier date. Notice of all such hearings shall be given the persons interested therein by mailing such notice to each public utility which may be affected by any order resulting therefrom and by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the county or counties wherein the facilities or areas that are the subject of the application are located. If, after such hearing, the commission finds that the transaction proposed is in good faith, that the proposed assignee, lessee, purchaser or transferee, is fit and able properly to perform the public utility services authorized by such certificate and to comply with the lawful rules, regulations and requirements of the commission, and that the transaction is otherwise consistent with the public interest, it may enter an order approving and authorizing such sale, lease, assignment or transfer upon such terms and conditions as it shall find to be just and reasonable and with such modifications as it may prescribe. Whenever such a transaction involves facilities that are included in the rate base of a public utility, the commission shall include, as a prerequisite to its finding that the transaction is consistent with the public interest, a finding that, upon the consummation of the transaction proposed: (a)(i) the native load customers of the public utility will continue to have a first priority to the use and/or benefit of such facilities, or (ii) any loss of such first priority by native load customers to the use and/or benefit of such facilities is not contrary to the public interest; and (b) any native load customers served by any transmission facilities shall be served on the same basis as before the transaction.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the application may be granted as applied for without a hearing in uncontested cases; however, the commission may hear any uncontested case if it determines that the public interest will be served thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-41; Laws, 1966, Ex Sess ch. 46, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2003).

§ 77-3-25.
Unlawful sale, lease, assignment or transfer of certificate or certain other utility property.

It shall be unlawful for any person, except as provided in Section 77-3-23 to accomplish or effectuate, or to participate in the accomplishing and effectuating, the sale, lease assignment or transfer of a certificate or other utility property described in Section 77-3-23, however the result is attained.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-42; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. ch. 46, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 351, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1994).

§ 77-3-27.
Commission to investigate violations.

The commission is hereby authorized, upon complaint or upon its own initiative, to investigate and determine whether any person is violating the provisions of Section 77-3-25.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-43; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess. ch. 46, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved December 28, 1966).

§ 77-3-29.
Extension of service.

The commission may, after hearing, upon notice, by order in writing, require every public utility to establish, construct, maintain and operate any reasonable extension of its existing facilities within the certificated area upon findings and order that such extension is reasonable and practicable, and provided further, that in the case of gas and water a sufficient supply is available and obtainable therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-06; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 6.

§ 77-3-31.
Accounts and depreciation reports of utilities.

The commission, by rules and regulations, after notice and hearing shall establish a system of accounts to be kept by the public utilities, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the provisions of this chapter, or the commission may classify said public utilities and establish a system of accounts for each class, and prescribe the manner in which such accounts shall be kept. Every such public utility shall keep and render to the commission in the manner and form prescribed by the commission uniform accounts of all its public utility operations. In the case of any public utility subject to regulation by a federal regulatory agency, compliance with the system of accounts prescribed for the particular class of utilities by such federal regulatory agency may be deemed sufficient compliance with the system prescribed by the commission; provided, however, that the commission may prescribe forms of books, accounts, records and memoranda covering information in addition to that required by such federal regulatory agency, where such do not conflict with those prescribed by such federal regulatory agency.

The commission shall, after hearing held upon reasonable notice, from time to time ascertain, determine and by order fix the proper and adequate rates and methods of depreciation, amortization or depletion of the several classes of property of each such public utility or class of public utilities which is subject to regulation by the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall, after hearing had upon reasonable notice, by order in writing require every such public utility or class of public utilities, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the provisions of this chapter, to carry a reasonable and adequate depreciation account in accordance with such rates and methods and with such rules, regulations, orders and forms of accounts as the commission shall prescribe to the extent allowed by the Internal Revenue Code and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Such public utility shall conform its depreciation accounts to the rates and methods so ascertained, determined and fixed. Such rates, methods and accounts shall be utilized uniformly and consistently throughout the rate setting and appeal proceedings.

In determining the allocation of tax savings derived from application of such methods as liberalized depreciation and amortization and the investment tax credit, the commission shall equitably balance the interests of present and future customers and shall apportion such benefits between consumers and the public utilities accordingly, to the extent allowed by the Internal Revenue Code and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Where any portion of the investment tax credit has been retained by a public utility, that same amount shall be deducted from the original cost of the facilities or other addition to the rate base to which the credit applied, to the extent allowed by the Internal Revenue Code and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

If the public utility is a member of an affiliated group that is eligible to file a consolidated income tax return, and if it is advantageous to the public utility to do so, income taxes shall be computed as though a consolidated return had been so filed and the utility had realized its fair share of the savings resulting from the consolidated return, unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the commission that it was reasonable to choose not to consolidate returns. The amount of income taxes saved by a consolidated group of which a public utility is a member by reason of the elimination in the consolidated return of the intercompany profit on purchases by the public utility from an affiliate shall be applied to reduce the cost of the property or services so purchased.

The commission shall require such public utilities to maintain a reasonably close relationship between their reserve for depreciation and the actual accumulated depreciation, and if such reasonably close relationship is not present, the commission may and should review and make appropriate changes in the annual charge to operating expenses on account of depreciation.

The commission, in determining the allowance for materials, equipment or services to be included in costs of operations for rate-making purposes, shall disallow any unreasonable profit made in the sale of materials, equipment or services supplied for any such public utility by any firm or corporation owned or controlled directly or indirectly by such utility or any affiliate, subsidiary, parent or holding company, associate or any corporation whose controlling stockholders are also controlling stockholders of such utility. The burden of proof shall be on the public utility to prove that no unreasonable profit is involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-07; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-33.
Rates, classifications and service of utilities.

No rate made, deposit or service charge demanded or received by any public utility shall exceed that which is just and reasonable. Such public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this article, may demand, collect and receive fair, just and reasonable rates for the services rendered or to be rendered by it to any person. Rates prescribed by the commission shall be such as to yield a fair rate of return to the utility furnishing service, upon the reasonable value of the property of the utility used or useful in furnishing service.

Such utility shall furnish adequate, efficient and reasonable service, and may establish reasonable rules governing the conduct of its business and the conditions under which it shall be required to render service. The commission may, after hearing upon reasonable notice had, upon its own motion or upon complaint, ascertain and fix just and reasonable standards, regulations and practices of service which are to be furnished, imposed, observed and followed by all public utilities. The commission may require the service, rules and regulations of each public utility to be filed with the commission and subjected to its approval or to such changes therein as the commission reasonably may require. Practices required or sanctioned pursuant to the provisions hereof shall supersede other requirements of law.

Such utility may employ in the conduct of its business suitable and reasonable classifications of its service, patrons, rates, deposits and service charges. The classification may, in any proper case, take into account the nature of the use, the quantity and quality used, the time when used, the purpose for which used, and any other reasonable consideration.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-08; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 8.